Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 25.
SECTION 2. (1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, when an action is pending  to
modify, terminate, satisfy, vacate or set aside a support order, the administrator may:
(a) Suspend enforcement of the support order; or
(b) Hold some or all moneys received from, or received on behalf of, an obligor  under a
support order for possible refund, reallocation or redistribution upon  resolution of the
pending action.
(2) The Department of Justice may suspend enforcement of a support order or hold
moneys received from, or received on behalf of, an obligor under a support order as described
in subsection (1) of this section if the administrator determines that:
(a) Collection of  child support will impair the ability of the obligor with physical custody
of all of the parties’ children to provide direct support to the children; or
(b) Resolution of the pending action will result in:
(A) A payee receiving more moneys than are due to the payee; or
(B) An adjustment that may cause an overpayment in favor of the state under ORS 25.125
(2).
(3) The administrator shall notify the parties when  it suspends enforcement of a support
order or holds moneys received under a support order under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) Any party may request an  administrative review of the administrator’s actions under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section by submitting  a written request for administrative
review to  the department. No later than 30 days following the receipt of a written request
for administrative review, the department shall conduct an administrative review to deter-
mine if  the department will resume enforcement of the support order or release moneys re-
ceived under the support order to a party. A party may appeal the administrator’s decision
under ORS 183.484.
(5) The department shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 25.125 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 363 (SB 363-A) Page 1
25.125. (1) The Department of Justice may return moneys to an obligor  when the department
determines that the obligor has paid more moneys than are due under a support obligation.  How-
ever, when the obligor has an ongoing support obligation, the  department may give the obligor
credit for the  excess amount paid and apply the credit to the future support obligation until the
credit is fully used. When the department applies a  credit to offset a future support obligation, the
department shall so notify the obligee. The notice must inform the obligee  that, if the obligee re-
quests, the department will conduct an administrative review to determine if  the record keeping and
accounting related to the calculation of the  credit balance is correct. The department shall conduct
the administrative review within 30 days after receiving the request.
(2) An overpayment in favor of the  state is created when the Department of Justice, under ORS
25.020, has transmitted moneys [ received from, or  on behalf of, ] to any person or entity, including
but not  limited to an obligor, an obligee or a collection agency, a child support agency of another
state or an agency of this state, and:
[(a) The amount transmitted is more than the support obligation requires and the Department  of
Justice has returned the excess to the obligor under subsection (1) of this section; ]
[(b) The Department of Justice has misapplied moneys received; or ]
[(c)] (a)  The amount transmitted  is attributable in whole or in part to a tax refund offset col-
lection all or part of which has been taken back by the Internal  Revenue Service or the Department
of Revenue[ .]; or
(b) The Department of Justice performed an accounting  adjustment that resulted in the
refund, reallocation or redistribution of  the amount transmitted to the state or any other
person or entity.
(3)(a) The person or entity to which the  moneys were transmitted owes the amount of the
overpayment to the state. The Department of Justice shall:
(A) Attempt to recover the overpayment if it is cost-effective to do so;
(B) Notify the person or  entity to whom the overpayment was made that the person or entity
owes money to the state  and specify the amount of the overpayment to be returned to the depart-
ment; and
(C) Give the person or entity opportunity to object.
(b) If the person or entity does not file a timely written objection, the  overpayment amount de-
termined by the department becomes a liquidated debt and creates  an account receivable owed to
the department, and the provisions of subsection (4) of this section apply.  If the department does not
resolve an objection to  the person’s or entity’s satisfaction, an administrative law judge assigned
from the Office of Administrative Hearings shall hear the objection.  An order by the administrative
law judge becomes a liquidated debt and creates an account receivable  owed to the department. The
person or entity may appeal the decision  of an administrative law judge to the circuit court for a
hearing de novo.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, if an agency of this or another state  owes
the overpayment,  the agency shall return the amount of the overpayment to the department without
notice and opportunity to object.
(4)(a) The amount of the overpayment specified in subsection (3)(a) of this section  is a liquidated
debt owed to the state  and an associated account receivable. The Department of Justice may re-
cover the debt by obtaining from the obligee  [ a voluntary assignment of ] an agreement to apply
all or a portion  of future support payments [ to be applied ] to the account receivable or in any other
way permitted by law.
(b) Accounts receivable are considered delinquent for purposes of  this subsection and are sub-
ject to the provisions of ORS chapter 293 if:
(A) The person or entity fails to make full payment within 90 days of liquidation; or
(B) A period of 90 days elapses without a payment as required by  a payment agreement between
the department and the obligated person or entity.
(5)(a) In addition to the account receivable created under subsection (2) of this section, a debt
in favor of the state and an associated account receivable are created when:
Enrolled Senate Bill 363 (SB 363-A) Page 2
(A) The Department of Justice receives payment for support amounts due  from an obligor, a
withholder subject to an order to withhold  under this chapter or another issuer on behalf of an
obligor;
(B) The [ Department of Justice ] department transmits the amount to any other  person or entity;
and
(C) The payment is dishonored or reversed.
(b) When a debt is created  under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the amount of money specified
in the payment is owed  to the state, and the department may collect the debt from one of the fol-
lowing:
(A) The obligor, regardless of who presented the check.
(B) The withholder, if the withholder presented the check.
(C) The other issuer, if another issuer presented the check.
(D) The person or entity to which the amount was transmitted by the department.
(c) The [ Department of Justice ] department shall:
(A) Attempt to recover the debt if it is cost-effective to do so;
(B) Notify the obligor, withholder or other issuer who made  the payment that the person or
entity owes the money to the state; and
(C) Specify the amount of the debt to be paid to the department.
(d) The amount of the debt specified  in paragraph (c) of this subsection is a liquidated debt owed
to the state and an account  receivable. The [ Department of Justice ] department  may recover the
debt and collect on the account receivable in any way permitted under law.
(e) Accounts receivable are considered delinquent for purposes  of this subsection and are sub-
ject to the provisions of ORS chapter 293 when:
(A) The person or entity fails to make full payment within 90 days of liquidation; or
(B) A period of 90 days elapses without a payment as required by  a payment agreement between
the department and the obligated person or entity.
[(6)(a) When an action is  pending to terminate, vacate or set aside a support order or to modify a
support order because of a change in physical custody of  the child, the administrator may suspend
enforcement of the support order if: ]
[(A) Collection of support would result in a credit balance if the motion were granted; or ]
[(B) Collection of child support would  impair the ability of the obligor with physical custody of all
of the parties’ children to provide direct support to the children. ]
[(b) The obligee  may object, within 14 days after the date of the notice of intent to suspend
enforcement of the support order, only on the grounds that: ]
[(A) The child is not in the physical custody of the obligor; ]
[(B) The child is in the physical custody of the obligor without the consent of the obligee; or ]
[(C) The basis for the suspension of enforcement is factually incorrect. ]
[(c) A  party may appeal the administrator’s decision to suspend or not to suspend enforcement of
the support order under ORS 183.484. ]
[(d) As used  in this subsection, “credit balance” means that payments have been made in excess
of all amounts owed by an obligor for ongoing and past due child support. ]
[(7)] (6) The Department of Justice shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of  this section.
SECTION 4.
Section 2 of this 2019 Act and the amendments to ORS 25.125 by section 3
of this 2019 Act become operative on January 1, 2020.
SECTION 5. The Department of Justice may  take any action before the operative date
specified in section 4 of this 2019 Act that is necessary for the department to  exercise, on
and after the operative date specified in section 4 of this 2019  Act, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the department by section 2 of this 2019 Act and the amendments
to ORS 25.125 by section 3 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 6.
This 2019 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 363 (SB 363-A) Page 3
Passed by Senate February 28, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House May 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 363 (SB 363-A) Page 4